Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Wyoming Health Care Decisions Act

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 35-22-401.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Health Care Decisions Act.”

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Live and Let Die: The Status of the ‘Right to Die’ in Wyoming,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 279 (1991).

§ 35-22-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Advance health care directive” means an individual instruction or a power of attorney for health care, or both;

“Agent” means an individual designated in a power of attorney for health care to make a health care decision for the individual granting the power;

“Artificial nutrition and hydration” means supplying food and water through a conduit, such as a tube or an intravenous line where the recipient is not required to chew or swallow voluntarily, including, but not limited to, nasogastric tubes, gastrostomies, jejunostomies and intravenous infusions. Artificial nutrition and hydration does not include assisted feeding, such as spoon or bottle feeding;

“Capacity” means an individual’s ability to understand the significant benefits, risks and alternatives to proposed health care and to make and communicate a health care decision;

“Community care facility” means a public or private facility responsible for the day-to-day care of persons with disabilities;

“Emancipated minor” means a minor who has become emancipated as provided in W.S.

14-1-201

through

14-1-206

;

“Guardian” means a judicially appointed guardian or conservator having authority to make a health care decision for an individual;

“Health care” means any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose or otherwise affect an individual’s physical or mental condition;

“Health care decision” means a decision made by an individual or the individual’s agent, guardian, or surrogate, regarding the individual’s health care, including:

Selection and discharge of health care providers and institutions;

Approval or disapproval of diagnostic tests, surgical procedures, programs of medication and orders not to resuscitate; and

Directions to provide, withhold or withdraw artificial nutrition and hydration and all other forms of health care.

“Health care institution” means an institution, facility or agency licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to provide health care in the ordinary course of business;

“Individual instruction” means an individual’s direction concerning a health care decision for the individual;

“Physician” means an individual authorized to practice medicine under the Wyoming Medical Practice Act;

“Power of attorney for health care” means the designation of an agent to make health care decisions for the individual granting the power;

“Primary health care provider” means any person licensed under the Wyoming statutes practicing within the scope of that license as a licensed physician, licensed physician’s assistant or licensed advanced practice registered nurse and who is designated by an individual or the individual’s agent, guardian or surrogate to have primary responsibility for the individual’s health care or, in the absence of a designation or if the designated provider is not reasonably available, a provider who undertakes the responsibility;

“Primary physician” means a physician designated by an individual or the individual’s agent, guardian or surrogate, to have primary responsibility for the individual’s health care or, in the absence of a designation or if the designated physician is not reasonably available, a physician who undertakes the responsibility;

“Reasonably available” means able to be contacted with a level of diligence appropriate to the seriousness and urgency of a patient’s health care needs and willing and able to act in a timely manner considering the urgency of the patient’s health care needs;

“Residential care facility” means a public or private facility providing for the residential and health care needs of the elderly or persons with disabilities or chronic mental illness;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 61, § 2.

“Surrogate” means an adult individual or individuals who:

Have capacity;

Are reasonably available;

Are willing to make health care decisions, including decisions to initiate, refuse to initiate, continue or discontinue the use of a life sustaining procedure on behalf of a patient who lacks capacity; and

Are identified by the primary health care provider in accordance with this act as the person or persons who are to make those decisions in accordance with this act.

“This act” means W.S.

35-22-401

through

35-22-416

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), added “and who is designated by an individual or the individual's agent, guardian or surrogate to have primary responsibility for the individual's health care or, in the absence of a designation or if the designated provider is not reasonably available, a provider who undertakes the responsibility” in (xiv); repealed (xix), which provided a definition for “Supervising health care provider”; and substituted “primary” for “supervising” in (xx)(D).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Medical Practice Act. —

See Title 33, Chapter 26.

Quoted in

Kindred Healthcare Operating, Inc. v. Boyd, 2017 WY 122, 403 P.3d 1014,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 35-22-403.
Advance health care directives.

An adult or emancipated minor may give an individual instruction. The instruction may be oral or written. The instruction may be limited to take effect only if a specified condition arises.

An adult or emancipated minor may execute a power of attorney for health care, which may authorize the agent to make any health care decision the principal could have made while having capacity. The power must be in writing and signed by the principal or by another person in the principal’s presence and at the principal’s expressed direction. The power remains in effect notwithstanding the principal’s later incapacity and may include individual instructions. Unless related to the principal by blood, marriage or adoption, an agent may not be an owner, operator or employee of a residential or community care facility at which the principal is receiving care. The durable power of attorney must be acknowledged before a notarial officer or must be signed by at least two (2) witnesses, each of whom witnessed either the signing of the instrument by the principal or the principal’s acknowledgement of the signature or of the instrument, each witness making the following declaration in substance:

I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of Wyoming that the person who signed or acknowledged this document is known to me to be the principal, and the principal signed or acknowledged this document in my presence.

None of the following shall be used as a witness for a power of attorney for health care:

A treating health care provider or employee of the provider;

The attorney-in-fact nominated in the writing;

The operator of a community care facility or employee of the operator or facility;

The operator of a residential care facility or employee of the operator or facility.

Unless otherwise specified in a power of attorney for health care, the authority of an agent becomes effective only upon a determination that the principal lacks capacity, and ceases to be effective upon a determination that the principal has recovered capacity.

Unless otherwise specified in a written advance health care directive, a determination that an individual lacks or has recovered capacity, or that another condition exists that affects an individual instruction or the authority of an agent, shall be made by the primary physician, but the treating primary health care provider may make the decision if the primary physician is unavailable.

An agent shall make a health care decision in accordance with the principal’s advance health care directive and other wishes to the extent known to the agent. Otherwise, the agent shall make the decision in accordance with the agent’s determination of the principal’s best interest. In determining the principal’s best interest, the agent shall consider the principal’s personal values to the extent known to the agent.

A health care decision made by an agent for a principal is effective without judicial approval.

A written advance health care directive may include the individual’s nomination of a guardian of the person.

An advance health care directive is valid for purposes of this act if it complied with the applicable law at the time of execution or communication.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), substituted “be acknowledged” for “either be sworn and acknowledged” in the introductory language, rewrote the declaration following, deleting “personally” following “document is” in the first sentence, deleting the language relating to the state of mind of the principal and employment status of the witness to a health care provider; substituted “treating primary” for “supervising” in (e); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in the fifth sentence of the introductory language of (b).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).

Cited in

Kindred Healthcare Operating, Inc. v. Boyd, 2017 WY 122, 403 P.3d 1014,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 35-22-404.
Revocation of advance health care directive.

An individual with capacity may revoke the designation of an agent only by a signed writing.

An individual with capacity may revoke all or part of an advance health care directive, other than the designation of an agent, at any time and in any manner that communicates an intention to revoke. Any oral revocation shall, as soon as possible after the revocation, be documented in a writing signed and dated by the individual or a witness to the revocation.

A health care provider, agent, guardian or surrogate who is informed of a revocation shall promptly communicate the fact of the revocation to the primary health care provider and to any health care institution at which the patient is receiving care.

A decree of annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage or legal separation revokes a previous designation of a spouse as agent unless otherwise specified in the decree or in a power of attorney for health care.

An advance health care directive that conflicts with an earlier advance health care directive revokes the earlier directive to the extent of the conflict.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “primary” for “supervising” in (c).

§ 35-22-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 61, § 2.

Editor's notes.—

This section, which pertained to forms for Advance Health Care Directives, was repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 61, § 2.

§ 35-22-406.
Decisions by surrogate.

If a valid advance health care directive does not exist, a surrogate may make a health care decision for a patient who is an adult or emancipated minor if the patient has been determined by the primary physician or the primary health care provider to lack capacity and no agent or guardian has been appointed or the agent or guardian is not reasonably available.

An adult or emancipated minor may designate any individual to act as surrogate by personally informing the primary health care provider. In the absence of a designation, or if the designee is not reasonably available, it is suggested that any member of the following classes of the patient’s family who is reasonably available, in descending order of priority, may act as surrogate:

The spouse, unless legally separated;

An adult child;

A parent;

A grandparent;

An adult brother or sister;

An adult grandchild.

If none of the individuals eligible to act as surrogate under subsection (b) of this section is reasonably available, an adult who has exhibited special care and concern for the patient, who is familiar with the patient’s personal values, and who is reasonably available may act as surrogate.

A surrogate shall communicate his assumption of authority as promptly as practicable to the members of the patient’s family specified in subsection (b) of this section who can be readily contacted.

If more than one (1) member of a class assumes authority to act as surrogate, and the other members of the class do not agree on a health care decision and the primary health care provider is so informed, the primary health care provider shall comply with the decision of a majority of the members of that class who have communicated their views to the provider.

A surrogate shall make a health care decision in accordance with the patient’s individual instructions, if any, and other wishes to the extent known to the surrogate. Otherwise, the surrogate shall make the decision in accordance with the surrogate’s determination of the patient’s best interest. In determining the patient’s best interest, the surrogate shall consider the patient’s personal, philosophical, religious and ethical values to the extent known to the surrogate and reliable oral or written statements previously made by the patient, including, but not limited to, statements made to family members, friends, health care providers or religious leaders.

A health care decision made by a surrogate for a patient is effective without judicial approval.

The patient at any time may disqualify another, including a member of the individual’s family, from acting as the individual’s surrogate by a signed writing or by personally informing the primary health care provider of the disqualification.

Unless related to the patient by blood, marriage or adoption, a surrogate may not be an owner, operator or employee of a residential or community care facility at which the patient is receiving care.

A primary health care provider may require an individual claiming the right to act as surrogate for a patient to provide a written declaration under penalty of perjury stating facts and circumstances reasonably sufficient to establish the claimed authority.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “primary” for “supervising” throughout, added “If a valid advance health care directive does not exist, a” in (a); and in (e), substituted “the other members of the class” for “they,” and deleted the last sentence, which related to the condition for disqualification of individuals from making the decision.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited in

Kindred Healthcare Operating, Inc. v. Boyd, 2017 WY 122, 403 P.3d 1014,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 35-22-407.
Decisions by guardian.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 61, § 2.

Absent a court order to the contrary, a health care decision of an agent takes precedence over that of a guardian.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 61, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 61, § 2.

A guardian’s authority to make health care decisions for the ward shall be as provided in W.S. 3-2-201(a)(iii), subject to the restrictions in W.S.

3-2-202

and 35-22-407(b).

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed (a) which read: “A guardian shall comply with the ward's individual instructions and may not revoke the ward's advance health care directive unless the appointing court expressly so authorizes”; repealed (c), which read: “A health care decision of a guardian takes precedence over that of a surrogate”; repealed (d) which read: “A health care decision made by a guardian for the ward is effective without judicial approval”; and added (e).

§ 35-22-408.
Obligations of health care provider.

Before implementing a health care decision made for a patient who is able to comprehend, a primary health care provider shall promptly communicate to the patient the decision made and may communicate the identity of the person making the decision.

A primary health care provider who knows of the existence of an advance health care directive, a revocation of an advance health care directive, or a designation or disqualification of a surrogate, shall promptly record its existence in the patient’s health care record and, if it is in writing, shall request a copy and if one is furnished shall arrange for its maintenance in the health care record.

The primary physician who makes or is informed of a determination that a patient lacks or has recovered capacity, or that another condition exists which affects an individual instruction or the authority of an agent, guardian or surrogate, shall promptly record the determination in the patient’s health care record and communicate the determination to the patient, if possible, and to any person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, a health care provider or institution providing care to a patient shall:

Comply with an individual instruction of the patient and with a reasonable interpretation of that instruction made by a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient; and

Comply with a health care decision for the patient made by a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient to the same extent as if the decision had been made by the patient while having capacity.

A health care provider may decline to comply with an individual instruction or health care decision for reasons of conscience. A health care institution may decline to comply with an individual instruction or health care decision if the instruction or decision is contrary to a written policy of the institution which is expressly based on reasons of conscience and if the policy was timely communicated to the patient or to a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient. The institution shall deliver the written policy upon receipt of the patient’s advance directive that may conflict with the policy or upon notice from the primary health care provider that the patient’s instruction or decision may be in conflict with the health care institution’s policy.

A health care provider or institution may decline to comply with an individual instruction or health care decision that requires medically ineffective health care or health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution.

A health care provider or institution that declines to comply with an individual instruction or health care decision shall:

Promptly so inform the patient, if possible, and any person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient;

Provide continuing care, including continuing life sustaining care, to the patient until a transfer can be effected; and

Unless the patient or person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient refuses assistance, immediately make all reasonable efforts to assist in the transfer of the patient to another health care provider or institution that is willing to comply with the instruction or decision.

A health care provider or institution may not require or prohibit the execution or revocation of an advance health care directive as a condition for providing health care.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “primary” for “supervising” in (a), (b) and (e) and made a similar change in (c); in (a), substituted “who is able to comprehend, a primary health” for “a supervising health,” deleted “if possible” following “provider,” inserted “may communicate”; and deleted “provider or” preceding “institution shall deliver” in (e).

§ 35-22-409.
Health care information.

Unless otherwise specified in an advance health care directive, a person then authorized to make health care decisions for a patient has the same rights as the patient to request, receive, examine, copy and consent to the disclosure of medical or any other health care information.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1.

§ 35-22-410.
Immunities.

A health care provider or institution acting in good faith and in accordance with generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for:

Complying with a health care decision of a person apparently having authority to make a health care decision for a patient, including a decision to withhold or withdraw health care;

Declining to comply with a health care decision of a person based on a belief that the person then lacked authority;

Complying with an advance health care directive and assuming that the directive was valid when made and has not been revoked or terminated;

Providing life-sustaining treatment in an emergency situation when the existence of a health care directive is unknown; or

Declining to comply with a health care decision or advance health care directive because the instruction is contrary to the conscience or good faith medical judgment of the health care provider, or the written policies of the institution.

An individual acting in good faith as agent or surrogate under this act is not subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution or to discipline by a licensing board for unprofessional conduct for health care decisions made in good faith.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), inserted “in good faith,” substituted “liability or criminal prosecution” for “or criminal liability,” and inserted “by a licensing board.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).

§ 35-22-411.
Statutory damages.

A health care provider or institution that violates this act willfully or with reckless disregard of the patient’s instruction or health care decision is subject to liability to the aggrieved individual for damages of five hundred dollars ($500.00) or actual damages resulting from the violation, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

A person who intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces or obliterates an individual’s advance health care directive or a revocation of an advance health care directive without the individual’s consent, or who coerces or fraudulently induces an individual to give, revoke or not to give an advance health care directive, is subject to liability to that individual for damages of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) or actual damages resulting from the action, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).

§ 35-22-412.
Capacity.

This act does not affect the right of an individual to make health care decisions while having capacity to do so.

An individual is presumed to have capacity to make a health care decision, to give or revoke an advance health care directive, and to designate or disqualify a surrogate unless the primary physician has certified in writing that the patient lacks such capacity.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “unless the primary physician has certified in writing that the patient lacks such capacity” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).

§ 35-22-413.
Effect of copy.

A copy of a written advance health care directive, revocation of an advance health care directive, or designation or disqualification of a surrogate has the same effect as the original.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1.

§ 35-22-414.
Effect of act.

This act does not create a presumption concerning the intention of an individual who has not made or who has revoked an advance health care directive.

Death resulting from the withholding or withdrawal of health care in accordance with this act does not for any purpose constitute a suicide or homicide or legally impair or invalidate a policy of insurance or an annuity providing a death benefit, notwithstanding any term of the policy or annuity to the contrary.

This act does not authorize mercy killing, assisted suicide, euthanasia or the provision, withholding or withdrawal of health care, to the extent prohibited by other statutes of this state.

This act does not authorize or require a health care provider or institution to provide health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution.

This act does not affect other statutes of this state governing treatment for mental illness of an individual involuntarily committed to a mental health care institution pursuant to law or a psychiatric advance directive executed in accordance with W.S.

35-22-301

through

35-22-308

.

Any cardiopulmonary resuscitation directives developed under W.S.

35-22-201

through 35-22-208 shall remain in effect unless specifically revoked by the advance health care directive.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).

§ 35-22-415.
Judicial relief.

On petition of a patient, the patient’s agent, guardian or surrogate, a health care provider or institution involved with the patient’s care, or an individual described in W.S. 35-22-406(b) or (c) the district court may enjoin or direct a health care decision or order other equitable relief. A proceeding under this section is governed by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

substituted “35-22-406(b) or (c)” for “35-22-105(b) or (c).”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-22-416.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject matter of this act among states enacting it.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-22-402(a)(xxi).